Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2514
Petitions; form; Secretary of State; duties; copies.

The Secretary of State shall design the form to be used for initiative and referendum petitions. The petitions shall conform to section 32-628. These forms shall be made available to the public by the city clerk, and they shall serve as a guide for individuals preparing prospective petitions. Substantial compliance with initiative and referendum forms is required before authorization to circulate such petition shall be granted by the city clerk pursuant to section 18-2512. Chief petitioners or circulators preparing prospective petitions shall be responsible for making copies of the petition for circulation after authorization for circulation has been granted.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 14;

Laws 1984, LB 1010, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 499.